src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
< [ w r i t e s "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  w r i t e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ w r i t e s "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ w r i t e s "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ w r i t e s "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  w r i t e %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ w r i t e s "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  w r i t e s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  g e t s %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  g e t %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
< [ g e t %  l o s t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  g e t s %  l o s t %  i n %  t h o u g h t %  w h i l e %  w r i t i n g %  s o m e t h i n g ] > # ;
